Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.430

Special meetings of voters—Place, notice, procedure, record.

All such special meetings shall be held at such schoolhouse or place as the board of directors may determine. The voting shall be by ballot, the ballots to be of white paper of uniform size and quality. At least ten days' notice of such special meeting shall be given by the school district superintendent, in the manner that notice is required to be given of the annual school election, which notice shall state the object or objects for which the meeting is to be held, and no other business shall be transacted at such meeting than such as is specified in the notice. The school district superintendent shall be the secretary of the meeting, and the chair of the board of directors or, in his or her absence, the senior director present, shall be chair of the meeting: PROVIDED, That in the absence of one or all of said officials, the qualified electors present may elect a chair or secretary, or both chair and secretary, of said meeting as occasion may require, from among their number. The secretary of the meeting shall make a record of the proceedings of the meeting, and when the secretary of such meeting has been elected by the qualified voters present, he or she shall within ten days thereafter, file the record of the proceedings, duly certified, with the superintendent of the district, and said records shall become a part of the records of the district, and be preserved as other records.

[ 2011 c 336 s 708; 1990 c 33 s 338; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.380. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 350 s 2; RRS s 5029; prior: 1897 c 118 s 157. Formerly RCW 28A.58.380, 28.58.380, 28.58.390, part.]